Utah statutes.
78A-10-301.   Creation.
(1)  There is created a Trial Court Nominating Commission for each
geographical division of the trial courts of record.
(2)  The Trial Court Nominating Commission shall nominate judges of the
district court and the juvenile court within its geographical division.
